Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1154.
do enact as follows:SB1154,13Section 1. 11.0101 (25) (a) 3. of the statutes is created to read:SB1154,2,5111.0101 (25) (a) 3. It spends more than $1,000 in a 12-month period on 2expenditures for express advocacy, expenditures made to support or defeat a 3referendum, and contributions made to a candidate committee, legislative 4campaign committee, or political party. In this subdivision, spending does not 5include a committee’s fundraising or administrative expenses.SB1154,2,66